North Dakota, session 69, SB2099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-18.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
Student athletics - Cardiac arrest prevention - Requirements.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Athletic activity" means:
(1) Interscholastic athletics.
(2) An athletic contest or competition, other than interscholastic athletics,
sponsored by or associated with a school district or nonpublic school,
including competitive and noncompetitive cheerleading, and any sports
activity sponsored by a studen t - run club .
(3) A practice for an activity under paragraph 1 or 2, including interscholastic
practice or scrimmage.
b. "Coach" means an individual responsible for providing training to or supervision
of a student participating in an athletic activity under subdivision a. The term
includes an athletic director and athletic trainer when so designated by the
principal of the school or nonpublic school.
2. The superintendent of public instruction, after consultation with experts in cardiac
arrest prevention, including health professionals, shall develop and make available on
the department of public instruction's website:
Page No. 1 25.0315.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. An information sheet describing cardiac arrest symptoms and warning signs,
including the risks associated with continuing to play or practice after
experiencing any of the following symptoms:
(1) Unexplained shortness of breath.
(2) Fainting or seizures during practice.
(3) Chest pains.
(4) Dizziness.
(5) Racing heart rate.
(6) Extreme fatigue.
b. A form verifying review of the information sheet, which requires the signature of a
student and the student's parent or legal guardian.
c. A list of informational resources, including videos and other materials provided by
an expert in cardiac arrest prevention.
3. Each school year, before:
a. A student may participate in an athletic activity, the student and the student's
parent or legal guardian shall sign and return to the student's school or nonpublic
school a copy of the verification form.
b. The athletic activity season begins:
(1) A principal of a school or nonpublic school shall inform each coach of the
coach's duties under this section.
(2) A coach shall:
(a) Complete a cardiac arrest training course approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The training must be provided in
correlation with any required cardiopulmonary resuscitation or
automated external defibrillators training.
(b) Hold an informational meeting before each athletic season regarding
the symptoms and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest, which may
include presentations from physicians, pediatric cardiologists, and
athletic trainers and resources provided under subdivision c o f
subsection 2 .
Page No. 2 25.0315.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. If a coach reasonably believes a student is exhibiting symptoms or warning signs of
sudden cardiac arrest, the coach may remove the student from participation in an
athletic activity. If the student is removed from the athletic activity, the coach shall
attempt to notify the student's parent or legal guardian.
5. A student who is removed from participation in an athletic activity under subsection 4
may not participate in an athletic activity until the student has been evaluated by and
received written clearance from a licensed physician, physician assistant, or nurse
practitioner.
6. The sponsor of a recreational youth athletic activity may follow the guidelines provided
under this section.
Page No. 3 25.0315.02000